Florida, session 2026, HB541.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (6) is added to section 119.0713,
Florida Statutes, to read:
119.0713 Local government agency exemptions from
inspection or copying of public records.—
(6)(a) As used in this subsection, the term:
1. "Body camera" means a portable electronic recording
device that is worn on a code inspector's body and that records
audio and video data in the course of the performance of his or
her official duties and responsibilities.
2. "Code inspector" has the same meaning as in s.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 541 2026
162.04(2).
3. "Personal representative" means a parent, a court-
appointed guardian, an attorney, an agent of, or a person
holding a power of attorney for, a person recorded by a body
camera. If the person depicted in the recording is deceased, the
term also means the personal representative of the estate of the
deceased person; the deceased person's surviving spouse, parent,
or adult child; the deceased person's attorney or agent; or the
parent or guardian of a surviving minor child of the deceased.
An agent must possess written authorization of the recorded
person to act on his or her behalf.
(b) A body camera recording, or a portion thereof, is
confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I
of the State Constitution if the recording:
1. Is taken within the interior of a private residence;
2. Is taken within the interior of a facility that offers
health care, mental health care, or social services; or
3. Is taken in a place that a reasonable person would
expect to be private.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a body camera
recording, or a portion thereof, may be disclosed by a local
government:
1. In furtherance of its official duties and
responsibilities; or
2. To another governmental agency in the furtherance of
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 541 2026
its official duties and responsibilities.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a body camera
recording, or a portion thereof, must be disclosed by a local
government:
1. To a person recorded by a body camera; however, a local
government may disclose only those portions that are relevant to
the person's presence in the recording;
2. To the personal representative of a person recorded by
a body camera; however, a local government may disclose only
those portions that are relevant to the represented person's
presence in the recording;
3. To a person not depicted in a body camera recording if
the recording depicts a place in which the person lawfully
resided, dwelled, or lodged at the time of the recording;
however, a local government may disclose only those portions
that record the interior of such a place; or
4. Pursuant to a court order.
a. In addition to any other grounds the court may consider
in determining whether to order that a body camera recording be
disclosed, the court shall consider whether:
(I) Disclosure is necessary to advance a compelling
interest;
(II) The recording contains information that is otherwise
exempt or confidential and exempt under the law;
(III) The person requesting disclosure is seeking to
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 541 2026
obtain evidence to determine legal issues in a case in which the
person is a party;
(IV) Disclosure would reveal information regarding a
person which is of a highly sensitive personal nature;
(V) Disclosure may harm the reputation or jeopardize the
safety of a person depicted in the recording;
(VI) Confidentiality is necessary to prevent a serious and
imminent threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly
administration of justice;
(VII) The recording could be redacted to protect privacy
interests; and
(VIII) There is good cause to disclose all or portions of
a recording.
b. In any proceeding regarding the disclosure of a body
camera recording, the local government that made the recording
must be given reasonable notice of hearings and an opportunity
to participate.
(e) A local government shall retain a body camera
recording for at least 90 days.
(f) The exemption provided in paragraph (b) applies
retroactively.
(g) This subsection does not supersede any other public
records exemption that existed before or is created after the
effective date of this exemption. Those portions of a recording
100 which are protected from disclosure by another public records
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 541 2026
101 exemption continue to be exempt or confidential and exempt.
102 (h) This subsection is subject to the Open Government
103 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
104 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from
105 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
106 Section 2. (1) The Legislature finds that it is a public
107 necessity that the following types of body camera recordings
108 recorded by a code inspector in the course of performing his or
109 her official duties and responsibilities be made confidential
110 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
111 Article I of the State Constitution:
112 (a) Recordings taken within the interior of a private
113 residence.
114 (b) Recordings taken within the interior of a facility
115 that offers health care, mental health care, or social services.
116 (c) Recordings taken in a place that a reasonable person
117 would expect to be private.
118 (2) The Legislature recognizes that body cameras preserve
119 information that has the potential to assist both code
120 inspectors' and the public's ability to review the accuracy of
121 code inspection work.
122 (3) However, the Legislature also finds that, in certain
123 instances, audio and video recorded by body cameras is
124 significantly likely to capture highly sensitive personal
125 information. The exemption of body camera recordings from public
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 541 2026
126 records requirements allows code inspectors to more effectively
127 and efficiently administer their duties, which would otherwise
128 be significantly impaired. The Legislature finds that the
129 concerns regarding the impact of public records requirements for
130 body camera recordings necessitate the exemption of the
131 recordings from public records requirements and outweigh any
132 public benefit that may be derived from such disclosure.
133 Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
134 that HB 539 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
135 legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
136 extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb541-00